Utah statutes.
76-5a-3.   Sexual exploitation of a minor -- Offenses.
(1)  A person is guilty of sexual exploitation of a minor:
(a)  when the person:
(i)  knowingly produces, possesses, or possesses with intent to distribute
child pornography; or
(ii)  intentionally distributes or views child pornography; or
(b)  if the person is a minor's parent or legal guardian and knowingly
consents to or permits that minor to be sexually exploited under Subsection
(1)(a).
(2)  Sexual exploitation of a minor is a felony of the second degree.
(3)  It is a separate offense under this section:
(a)  for each minor depicted, and if more than one minor is depicted in the
child pornography in violation of this section, the depiction of each
individual minor in the child pornography is a separate offense; and
(b)  each time the same minor is depicted in different child pornography.
(4)  It is an affirmative defense to a charge of violating this section that
no person under 18 years of age was actually depicted in the visual depiction
or used in producing or advertising the visual depiction.
(5)  This section may not be construed to impose criminal or civil liability
on:
(a)  any entity or an employee, director, officer, or agent of an entity when
acting within the scope of employment, for the good faith performance of:
(i)  reporting or data preservation duties required under any federal or state
law; or
(ii)  implementing a policy of attempting to prevent the presence of child
pornography on any tangible or intangible property, or of detecting and
reporting the presence of child pornography on the property; or
(b)  any law enforcement officer acting within the scope of a criminal
investigation.
